Washington statutes.
RCW 19.16.310

Board—Compensation—Reimbursement of travel expenses.

Each member of the board appointed by the governor shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and in addition thereto shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred while on official business of the board and in attending meetings thereof, in accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 1984 c 287 s 54; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 58; 1971 ex.s. c 253 s 22.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.